Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-503
Game; illegal possession;
exception.

It shall be unlawful for anyone to have in his
or her possession, except during the open season thereon, any unmounted game
except as allowed by the Game Law or the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated and commission orders passed by the
commission.

Laws 1945, c. 79, § 1(2), p. 295;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-304.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 223;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 66;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 26;

Laws 2013, LB499, § 12.